Washington statutes.
RCW 35.82.240

Rural housing projects.

Housing authorities created for counties are specifically empowered and authorized to borrow money, accept grants and exercise their other powers to provide housing for farmers of low income as herein defined. In providing such housing, such housing authorities shall not be subject to the tenant selection limitations provided in RCW 35.82.090(3). In connection with such projects, such housing authorities may enter into such leases or purchase agreements, accept such conveyances and rent or sell dwellings forming part of such projects to or for farmers of low income, as such housing authority deems necessary in order to assure the achievement of the objectives of this chapter. Such leases, agreements or conveyances may include such covenants as the housing authority deems appropriate regarding such dwellings and the tracts of land described in any such instrument, which covenants shall be deemed to run with the land where the housing authority deems it necessary and the parties to such instrument so stipulate. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed as limiting any other powers of any housing authority.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.82.240. Prior: 1941 c 69 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 6889-23a. Formerly RCW 74.24.240.]